Illinois, session 104th, SB3118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5adding Sections 3.14 and 4.02i as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 105/3.14 new)7    Sec. 3.14. Asset management company. "Asset management 8company" means any business primarily engaged in managing and 9investing client funds in assets including, but not limited 10to, securities, equities, stocks, bonds, real estate, 11investment funds, mutual funds, exchange-traded funds, hedge 12funds, private equity funds, and venture capital. 13    (20 ILCS 105/4.02i new)14    Sec. 4.02i. Adult day services; disclosure, anti-looting, 15and consumer protections.16    (a)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 17rules requiring adult day service providers serving 18individuals with developmental disabilities to disclose, upon 19initial application for certification and on a quarterly basis 20thereafter, whether the provider, its subsidiaries, 21affiliates, parent companies, or contractual service providers 22are owned, managed, or contained within a fund owned or   SB3118- 2 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1managed by an asset management company. Such providers shall 2be required to disclose, on forms prescribed by the 3Department, the size of the asset management company's assets 4under management; individuals and institutions with interests 5in the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 6companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 7containing the same; debt held by the provider, its 8subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 9service providers, and the fund containing the same; fees and 10payments, and rates for the same, collected by the asset 11management company, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 12companies, partners, contractual service providers for goods 13or services provided to the provider, its subsidiaries, 14affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 15and the fund containing the same; the number of full-time and 16part-time employees and contractors, grouped by job 17classification, employed or under contract with the provider, 18its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 19service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 20representing the same.21    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 22providers to provide the Department with written notice of 23transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 24transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 25otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 26provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or   SB3118- 3 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 2transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 3amount of the assets or operations of the provider, its 4subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 5service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 6copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 7provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 8agreement or transaction.9    (b)(1) A provider owned, managed, or contained within a 10fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 11parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 12manages the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 13parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 14containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 15involving the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 16parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 17containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 18likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 19financial distress of the provider, its subsidiaries, 20affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 21providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 22the same.23    (2) A provider owned, managed, or contained within a fund 24owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 25companies, or an asset management company which owns or 26manages the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities,   SB3118- 4 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 2containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 3that would result in the provider, its subsidiaries, 4affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service 5providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 6debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 7fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 8amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other 9metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of 10causing the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 11parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 12financially distressed.13    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 14practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 15Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 16violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 17and any labor organization representing workers who work or 18worked for the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 19companies, or contractual service providers or in the 20facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 21under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 22or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 23organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 24provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 25companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 26facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to   SB3118- 5 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 2Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 3require violators of this Section to prominently display a 4notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 5duration prescribed by the Department.6    (d) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 7notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 8this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued 9under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 10public viewing. 11    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 12Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 132 and by adding Sections 15.2a and 68a as follows: 14    (20 ILCS 1705/2)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 100-2)15    Sec. 2. Definitions; administrative subdivisions. 16    (a) For the purposes of this Act, unless the context 17otherwise requires:18    "Asset management company" means any business primarily 19engaged in managing and investing client funds in assets 20including, but not limited to, securities, equities, stocks, 21bonds, real estate, investment funds, mutual funds, 22exchange-traded funds, hedge funds, private equity funds, and 23venture capital. 24    "Department" means the Department of Human Services,   SB3118- 6 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1successor to the former Department of Mental Health and 2Developmental Disabilities.3    "Developmental disability" means "developmental 4disability" as defined in Section 1-106 of the Mental Health 5and Developmental Disabilities Code.6    "Intellectual disability" means the "intellectual 7disability" as defined in Section 1-116 of the Mental Health 8and Developmental Disabilities Code.9    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Human Services.10    (b) Unless the context otherwise requires:11        (1) References in this Act to the programs or 12    facilities of the Department shall be construed to refer 13    only to those programs or facilities of the Department 14    that pertain to mental health or developmental 15    disabilities.16        (2) References in this Act to the Department's service 17    providers or service recipients shall be construed to 18    refer only to providers or recipients of services that 19    pertain to the Department's mental health and 20    developmental disabilities functions.21        (3) References in this Act to employees of the 22    Department shall be construed to refer only to employees 23    whose duties pertain to the Department's mental health and 24    developmental disabilities functions.25    (c) The Secretary shall establish such subdivisions of the 26Department as shall be desirable and shall assign to the   SB3118- 7 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1various subdivisions the responsibilities and duties placed 2upon the Department by the Laws of the State of Illinois.3    (d) There is established a coordinator of services to deaf 4and hearing impaired persons with mental disabilities. In 5hiring this coordinator, every consideration shall be given to 6qualified deaf or hearing impaired individuals.7    (e) Whenever the administrative director of the 8subdivision for mental health services is not a 9board-certified psychiatrist, the Secretary shall appoint a 10Chief for Clinical Services who shall be a board-certified 11psychiatrist with both clinical and administrative experience. 12The Chief for Clinical Services shall be responsible for all 13clinical and medical decisions for mental health services.14(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.) 15    (20 ILCS 1705/15.2a new)16    Sec. 15.2a. Adult developmental training services; 17disclosure, anti-looting, and consumer protections.18    (a)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 19rules requiring providers of adult developmental training 20services to disclose, both upon initial application for 21certification and on a quarterly basis thereafter, whether the 22provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 23contractual service providers are owned, managed, or contained 24within a fund owned or managed by an asset management company. 25Such providers shall be required to disclose, on forms   SB3118- 8 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1prescribed by the Department, the size of the asset management 2company's assets under management; individuals and 3institutions with interests in the provider, its subsidiaries, 4affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 5and the fund containing the same; debt held by the provider, 6its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 7service providers, and the fund containing the same; fees and 8payments, and rates for the same, collected by the asset 9management company, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 10companies, partners, contractual service providers for goods 11or services provided to the provider, its subsidiaries, 12affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 13and the fund containing the same; the number of full-time and 14part-time employees and contractors, grouped by job 15classification, employed or under contract with the provider, 16its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 17service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 18representing the same.19    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 20providers to provide the Department with written notice of 21transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 22transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 23otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 24provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 25contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 26transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material   SB3118- 9 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1amount of the assets or operations of the provider, its 2subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 3service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 4copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 5provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 6agreement or transaction.7    (b)(1) A provider owned, managed, or contained within a 8fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 9parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 10manages the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 11parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 12containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 13involving the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 14parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 15containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 16likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 17financial distress of the provider, its subsidiaries, 18affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 19providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 20the same.21    (2) A provider owned, managed, or contained within a fund 22owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 23companies, or an asset management company which owns or 24manages the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 25parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 26containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions   SB3118- 10 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1that would result in the provider, its subsidiaries, 2affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service 3providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 4debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 5fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 6amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other 7metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of 8causing the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 9parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 10financially distressed.11    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 12practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 13Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 14violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 15and any labor organization representing workers who work or 16worked for the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 17companies, or contractual service providers or in the 18facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 19under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 20or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 21organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 22provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 23companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 24facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 25action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 26Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also   SB3118- 11 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1require violators of this Section to prominently display a 2notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 3duration prescribed by the Department.4    (d) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 5notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 6this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued 7under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 8public viewing. 9    (20 ILCS 1705/68a new)10    Sec. 68a. Supported employment services; disclosure, 11anti-looting, and consumer protections.12    (a)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 13rules requiring supported employment providers to disclose, 14both upon initial application for enrollment and on a 15quarterly basis thereafter, whether the provider, its 16subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 17service providers are owned, managed, or contained within a 18fund owned or managed by an asset management company. Such 19providers shall be required to disclose, on forms prescribed 20by the Department, the size of the asset management company's 21assets under management; individuals and institutions with 22interests in the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, 23parent companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 24containing the same; debt held by the provider, its 25subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual   SB3118- 12 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1service providers, and the fund containing the same; fees and 2payments, and rates for the same, collected by the asset 3management company, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 4companies, partners, contractual service providers for goods 5or services provided to the provider, its subsidiaries, 6affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 7and the fund containing the same; the number of full-time and 8part-time employees and contractors, grouped by job 9classification, employed or under contract with the provider, 10its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 11service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 12representing the same.13    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 14providers to provide the Department with written notice of 15transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 16transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 17otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 18provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 19contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 20transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 21amount of the assets or operations of the provider, its 22subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 23service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 24copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 25provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 26agreement or transaction.  SB3118- 13 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1    (b)(1) A provider owned, managed, or contained within a 2fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 3parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 4manages the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 5parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 6containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 7involving the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 8parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 9containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 10likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 11financial distress of the provider, its subsidiaries, 12affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 13providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 14the same.15    (2) A provider owned, managed, or contained within a fund 16owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 17companies, or an asset management company which owns or 18manages the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 19parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 20containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 21that would result in the provider, its subsidiaries, 22affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service 23providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 24debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 25fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 26amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other   SB3118- 14 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of 2causing the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 3parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 4financially distressed.5    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 6practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 7Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 8violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 9and any labor organization representing workers who work or 10worked for the provider, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 11companies, or contractual service providers or in the 12facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 13under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 14or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 15organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 16provider, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 17companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 18facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 19action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 20Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 21require violators of this Section to prominently display a 22notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 23duration prescribed by the Department.24    (d) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 25notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 26this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued   SB3118- 15 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 2public viewing. 3    Section 15. The Community Living Facilities Licensing Act 4is amended by changing Section 3 and by adding Section 19 as 5follows: 6    (210 ILCS 35/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4183)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires, the terms defined in this Section 9have the meanings ascribed to them herein.10    (1) "Adult" means a person 18 years of age or older.11    (2) "Applicant" means any person, agency, association, 12corporation, partnership, or organization making application 13for a license.14    (3) "Appropriate programming" means programming which 15meets each resident's individual needs commensurate with his 16functioning level.17    (3-5) "Asset management company" means any business 18primarily engaged in managing and investing client funds in 19assets including, but not limited to, securities, equities, 20stocks, bonds, real estate, investment funds, mutual funds, 21exchange-traded funds, hedge funds, private equity funds, and 22venture capital. 23    (4) "Community Living Facility" means a transitional 24residential setting which provides guidance, supervision,   SB3118- 16 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1training and other assistance to ambulatory or mobile adults 2with a mild or moderate developmental disability with the goal 3of eventually moving these persons to more independent living 4arrangements. Residents are required to participate in day 5activities, such as vocational training, sheltered workshops 6or regular employment. A Community Living Facility shall not 7be a nursing or medical facility and shall house no more than 820 residents, excluding staff.9    (5) "Department" means the Department of Public Health.10    (6) "Director" means the Director of the Department of 11Public Health.12    (7) "Habilitation plan" means a written plan as defined in 13the "Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code of 141979", as now or hereafter amended.15    (8) "License" means any of the following types of licenses 16issued to an applicant or licensee by the Department: 17        (a) "Probationary license" means a license issued to 18    an applicant or licensee which has not held a license 19    contiguous to its application. 20        (b) "Regular license" means a license issued to an 21    applicant or licensee which is in substantial compliance 22    with this Act and any rules and regulations promulgated 23    hereunder.24    (9) "Licensee" means a person, agency, association, 25corporation, partnership, or organization which has been 26issued a license to operate a Community Living Facility.  SB3118- 17 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1    (10) "Owner" means the individual, partnership, 2corporation, association or other person who owns a Community 3Living Facility. In the event a Community Living Facility is 4operated by a person who leases the physical plant, which is 5owned by another person, "owner" means the person who operates 6the Community Living Facility, except that if the person who 7owns the physical plant is an affiliate of the person who 8operates the Community Living Facility and has significant 9control over the day-to-day operations of the Community Living 10Facility, the person who owns the physical plant shall incur 11jointly and severally with the owner all liabilities imposed 12on an owner under this Act.13    (11) "Plan of correction" means a written plan submitted 14to the Department for violation of this Act or of rules 15promulgated hereunder which are cited by the Department. The 16plan shall describe the steps that will be taken in order to 17bring the Community Living Facility into compliance and the 18time-frame for completion of each step.19    (12) "Qualified surveyor" means any individual or any 20governmental agency designated by the Department to survey 21Community Living Facilities for compliance with this Act and 22the rules and regulations promulgated under this Act.23    (13) "Resident" means a person residing in a Community 24Living Facility pursuant to this Act.25    (14) "Support services" means those services provided to 26residents in order to facilitate their integration into the   SB3118- 18 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1community and to improve their level of functioning, 2independence and self-respect.3(Source: P.A. 88-380.) 4    (210 ILCS 35/19 new)5    Sec. 19. Community Living Facilities; disclosure, 6anti-looting, and consumer protections.7    (a)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 8rules requiring Community Living Facilities to disclose, both 9upon initial application for licensure and on a quarterly 10basis thereafter, whether the facility, its subsidiaries, 11affiliates, parent companies, or contractual service providers 12are owned, managed, or contained within a fund owned or 13managed by an asset management company. Such facilities shall 14be required to disclose, both upon initial application for 15licensure and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the size of the 16asset management company's assets under management; 17individuals and institutions with interests in the facilities, 18its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 19service providers, and the fund containing the same; debt held 20by the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 21companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 22containing the same; fees and payments, and rates for the 23same, collected by the asset management company, its 24subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, partners, 25contractual service providers for goods or services provided   SB3118- 19 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1to the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 2companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 3containing the same; the number of full-time and part-time 4employees and contractors, grouped by job classification, 5employed or under contract with the facility, its 6subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 7service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 8representing the same.9    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 10facilities to provide the Department with written notice of 11transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 12transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 13otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 14facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 15contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 16transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 17amount of the assets or operations of the facility, its 18subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 19service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 20copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 21provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 22agreement or transaction.23    (b)(1) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a 24fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 25parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 26manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities,   SB3118- 20 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 2containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 3involving the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 4parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 5containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 6likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 7financial distress of the facility, its subsidiaries, 8affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 9providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 10the same.11    (2) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a fund 12owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 13companies, or an asset management company which owns or 14manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 15parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 16containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 17that would result in the facility, its subsidiaries, 18affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service 19providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 20debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 21fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 22amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other 23metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of 24causing the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 25parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 26financially distressed.  SB3118- 21 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 2practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 3Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 4violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 5and any labor organization representing workers who work or 6worked for the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 7companies, or contractual service providers or in the 8facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 9under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 10or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 11organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 12facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 13companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 14facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 15action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 16Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 17require violators of this Section to prominently display a 18notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 19duration prescribed by the Department.20    (d) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 21notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 22this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued 23under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 24public viewing. 25    Section 20. The MC/DD Act is amended by adding Section   SB3118- 22 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b13-103a as follows: 2    (210 ILCS 46/3-103a new)3    Sec. 3-103a. MC/DD facilities; disclosure, anti-looting, 4and consumer protections.5    (a) As used in this Section, "asset management company" 6means any business primarily engaged in managing and investing 7client funds in assets including, but not limited to, 8securities, equities, stocks, bonds, real estate, investment 9funds, mutual funds, exchange-traded funds, hedge funds, 10private equity funds, and venture capital. 11    (b)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 12rules requiring MC/DD facilities to disclose, both upon 13initial application for licensure and on a quarterly basis 14thereafter, whether the facility, its subsidiaries, 15affiliates, parent companies, or contractual service providers 16are owned, managed, or contained within a fund owned or 17managed by an asset management company. Such facilities shall 18be required to disclose, both upon initial application for 19licensure and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the size of the 20asset management company's assets under management; 21individuals and institutions with interests in the facilities, 22its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 23service providers, and the fund containing the same; debt held 24by the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 25companies, contractual service providers, and the fund   SB3118- 23 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1containing the same; fees and payments, and rates for the 2same, collected by the asset management company, its 3subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, partners, 4contractual service providers for goods or services provided 5to the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 6companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 7containing the same; the number of full-time and part-time 8employees and contractors, grouped by job classification, 9employed or under contract with the facility, its 10subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 11service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 12representing the same.13    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 14facilities to provide the Department with written notice of 15transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 16transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 17otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 18facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 19contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 20transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 21amount of the assets or operations of the facility, its 22subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 23service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 24copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 25provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 26agreement or transaction.  SB3118- 24 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1    (c)(1) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a 2fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 3parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 4manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 5parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 6containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 7involving the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 8parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 9containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 10likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 11financial distress of the facility, its subsidiaries, 12affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 13providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 14the same.15    (2) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a fund 16owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 17companies, or an asset management company which owns or 18manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 19parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 20containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 21that would result in the facility, its subsidiaries, 22affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service 23providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 24debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 25fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 26amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other   SB3118- 25 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of 2causing the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 3parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 4financially distressed.5    (d) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 6practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 7Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 8violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 9and any labor organization representing workers who work or 10worked for the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 11companies, or contractual service providers or in the 12facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 13under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 14or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 15organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 16facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 17companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 18facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 19action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 20Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 21require violators of this Section to prominently display a 22notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 23duration prescribed by the Department.24    (e) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 25notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 26this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued   SB3118- 26 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 2public viewing. 3    Section 25. The ID/DD Community Care Act is amended by 4adding Section 3-103a as follows: 5    (210 ILCS 47/3-103a new)6    Sec. 3-103a. ID/DD; disclosure, anti-looting, and consumer 7protections.8    (a) As used in this Section, "asset management company" 9means any business primarily engaged in managing and investing 10client funds in assets including, but not limited to, 11securities, equities, stocks, bonds, real estate, investment 12funds, mutual funds, exchange-traded funds, hedge funds, 13private equity funds, and venture capital.14    (b)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 15rules requiring ID/DD facilities to disclose, both upon 16initial application for licensure and on a quarterly basis 17thereafter, whether the facility, its subsidiaries, 18affiliates, parent companies, or contractual service providers 19are owned, managed, or contained within a fund owned or 20managed by an asset management company. Such facilities shall 21be required to disclose, both upon initial application for 22licensure and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the size of the 23asset management company's assets under management; 24individuals and institutions with interests in the facilities,   SB3118- 27 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 2service providers, and the fund containing the same; debt held 3by the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 4companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 5containing the same; fees and payments, and rates for the 6same, collected by the asset management company, its 7subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, partners, 8contractual service providers for goods or services provided 9to the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 10companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 11containing the same; the number of full-time and part-time 12employees and contractors, grouped by job classification, 13employed or under contract with the facility, its 14subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 15service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 16representing the same.17    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 18facilities to provide the Department with written notice of 19transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 20transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 21otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 22facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 23contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 24transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 25amount of the assets or operations of the facility, its 26subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual   SB3118- 28 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 2copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 3provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 4agreement or transaction.5    (c)(1) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a 6fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 7parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 8manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 9parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 10containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 11involving the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 12parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 13containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 14likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 15financial distress of the facility, its subsidiaries, 16affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 17providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 18the same.19    (2) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a fund 20owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 21companies, or an asset management company which owns or 22manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 23parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 24containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 25that would result in the facility, its subsidiaries, 26affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service   SB3118- 29 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 2debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 3fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 4amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other 5metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of 6causing the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 7parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 8financially distressed.9    (d) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 10practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 11Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 12violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 13and any labor organization representing workers who work or 14worked for the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 15companies, or contractual service providers or in the 16facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 17under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 18or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 19organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 20facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 21companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 22facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 23action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 24Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 25require violators of this Section to prominently display a 26notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a   SB3118- 30 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1duration prescribed by the Department.2    (e) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 3notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 4this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued 5under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 6public viewing. 7    Section 30. The Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 8Licensure and Certification Act is amended by changing Section 93 and by adding Section 9a as follows: 10    (210 ILCS 135/3)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1703)11    Sec. 3. As used in this Act, unless the context requires 12otherwise:13    (a) "Applicant" means a person, group of persons, 14association, partnership, or corporation that applies for a 15license as a community developmental services agency under 16this Act.17    (a-5) "Asset management company" means any business 18primarily engaged in managing and investing client funds in 19assets including, but not limited to, securities, equities, 20stocks, bonds, real estate, investment funds, mutual funds, 21exchange-traded funds, hedge funds, private equity funds, and 22venture capital. 23    (b) "Community developmental services agency" or "agency" 24means a public or private agency, association, partnership,   SB3118- 31 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1corporation, or organization which, pursuant to this Act, 2certifies community-integrated living arrangements for persons 3with a developmental disability.4    (c) "Department" means the Department of Human Services 5(as successor to the Department of Mental Health and 6Developmental Disabilities).7    (d) "Community-integrated living arrangement" means a 8living arrangement certified by a community developmental 9services agency under this Act where 8 or fewer recipients 10with a developmental disability who reside under the 11supervision of the agency. Examples of community-integrated 12living arrangements include, but are not limited to, the 13following:14        (1) "Adult foster care", a living arrangement for 15    recipients in residences of families unrelated to them, 16    for the purpose of providing family care for the 17    recipients on a full-time basis;18        (2) "Assisted residential care", an independent living 19    arrangement where recipients are intermittently supervised 20    by off-site staff;21        (3) "Crisis residential care", a non-medical living 22    arrangement where recipients in need of non-medical, 23    crisis services are supervised by on-site staff 24 hours a 24    day;25        (4) "Home individual programs", living arrangements 26    for 2 unrelated adults outside the family home;  SB3118- 32 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1        (5) "Supported residential care", a living arrangement 2    where recipients are supervised by on-site staff and such 3    supervision is provided less than 24 hours a day;4        (6) "Community residential alternatives", as defined 5    in the Community Residential Alternatives Licensing Act; 6    and7        (7) "Special needs trust-supported residential care", 8    a living arrangement where recipients are supervised by 9    on-site staff and that supervision is provided 24 hours 10    per day or less, as dictated by the needs of the 11    recipients, and determined by service providers. As used 12    in this item (7), "special needs trust" means a trust for 13    the benefit of a beneficiary with a disability as 14    described in Section 1213 of the Illinois Trust Code.15    (e) "Recipient" means a person who has received, is 16receiving, or is in need of treatment or habilitation as those 17terms are defined in the Mental Health and Developmental 18Disabilities Code.19    (f) "Unrelated" means that persons residing together in 20programs or placements certified by a community developmental 21services agency under this Act do not have any of the following 22relationships by blood, marriage, or adoption: parent, son, 23daughter, brother, sister, grandparent, uncle, aunt, nephew, 24niece, great grandparent, great uncle, great aunt, 25stepbrother, stepsister, stepson, stepdaughter, stepparent, or 26first cousin.  SB3118- 33 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1(Source: P.A. 104-270, eff. 8-15-25; revised 12-12-25.) 2    (210 ILCS 135/9a new)3    Sec. 9a. CILAs; disclosure, anti-looting, and consumer 4protections.5    (a)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 6rules requiring agencies to disclose, both upon initial 7application for licensure and on a quarterly basis thereafter, 8whether the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 9companies, or contractual service providers are owned, 10managed, or contained within a fund owned or managed by an 11asset management company. Such agencies shall be required to 12disclose, both upon initial application for licensure and on a 13quarterly basis thereafter, the size of the asset management 14company's assets under management; individuals and 15institutions with interests in the agency, its subsidiaries, 16affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 17and the fund containing the same; debt held by the agency, its 18subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 19service providers, and the fund containing the same; fees and 20payments, and rates for the same, collected by the asset 21management company, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 22companies, partners, contractual service providers for goods 23or services provided to the agency, its subsidiaries, 24affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 25and the fund containing the same; the number of full-time and   SB3118- 34 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1part-time employees and contractors, grouped by job 2classification, employed or under contract with the agency, 3its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 4service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 5representing the same.6    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring 7agencies to provide the Department with written notice of 8transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 9transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 10otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 11agency, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 12contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 13transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 14amount of the assets or operations of the agency, its 15subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 16service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 17copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 18provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 19agreement or transaction.20    (b)(1) An agency owned, managed, or contained within a 21fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 22parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 23manages the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 24parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 25containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 26involving the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities,   SB3118- 35 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 2containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 3likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 4financial distress of the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated 5entities, parent companies, or contractual service providers, 6due to placing an excessively high level of debt on the same.7    (2) An agency owned, managed, or contained within a fund 8owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 9companies, or an asset management company which owns or 10manages the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 11parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 12containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 13that would result in the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated 14entities, parent companies, contractual service providers, or 15the fund containing the same (i) issuing debt-funded 16dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar fees or 17costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an amount, or 18perform any other action or exceed any other metric, where 19such actions have a reasonable likelihood of causing the 20agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 21companies, or contractual service providers to become 22financially distressed.23    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 24practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 25Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 26violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General   SB3118- 36 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1and any labor organization representing workers who work or 2worked for the agency, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 3companies, or contractual service providers or in the 4facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 5under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 6or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 7organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 8agency, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 9companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 10facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 11action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 12Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 13require violators of this Section to prominently display a 14notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 15duration prescribed by the Department.16    (d) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 17notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 18this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued 19under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for 20public viewing. 21    Section 35. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 22Sections 2.41 and 7.6a as follows: 23    (225 ILCS 10/2.41 new)24    Sec. 2.41. Asset management company. "Asset management   SB3118- 37 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1company" means any business primarily engaged in managing and 2investing client funds in assets including, but not limited 3to, securities, equities, stocks, bonds, real estate, 4investment funds, mutual funds, exchange-traded funds, hedge 5funds, private equity funds, and venture capital. 6    (225 ILCS 10/7.6a new)7    Sec. 7.6a. Child care institutions and group homes for 8children with developmental disabilities; disclosure, 9anti-looting, and consumer protections.10    (a)(1) By December 31, 2026, the Department shall adopt 11rules requiring child care institutions and group homes for 12children with developmental disabilities to disclose, both 13upon initial application for licensure and on a quarterly 14basis thereafter, whether the facility, its subsidiaries, 15affiliates, parent companies, or contractual service providers 16are owned, managed, or contained within a fund owned or 17managed by an asset management company. Such facilities shall 18be required to disclose, on forms prescribed by the 19Department, the size of the asset management company's assets 20under management; individuals and institutions with interests 21in the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 22companies, contractual service providers, and the fund 23containing the same; debt held by the facility, its 24subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 25service providers, and the fund containing the same; fees and   SB3118- 38 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1payments, and rates for the same, collected by the asset 2management company, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 3companies, partners, contractual service providers for goods 4or services provided to the facility, its subsidiaries, 5affiliates, parent companies, contractual service providers, 6and the fund containing the same; the number of full-time and 7part-time employees and contractors, grouped by job 8classification, employed or under contract with the facility, 9its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, contractual 10service providers and, where applicable, labor organizations 11representing the same.12    (2) The Department shall also adopt rules requiring such 13facilities to provide the Department with written notice of 14transactions, and copies of agreements, which would (i) sell, 15transfer, lease, exchange, option, encumber, convey, or 16otherwise dispose of a material amount of the assets of the 17facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or 18contractual service providers, to one or more entities or (ii) 19transfer control, responsibility, or governance of a material 20amount of the assets or operations of the facility, its 21subsidiaries, affiliates, parent companies, or contractual 22service providers, to one or more entities. Written notice and 23copies of agreements required under this paragraph shall be 24provided not less than 90 days prior to entering into the 25agreement or transaction.26    (b)(1) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a   SB3118- 39 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1fund owned or managed by an asset management company, its 2parent companies, or an asset management company which owns or 3manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 4parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 5containing the same, shall not engage in a transaction 6involving the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 7parent companies, contractual service providers, or the fund 8containing the same, if the transaction has a reasonable 9likelihood of causing or materially contributing to the 10financial distress of the facility, its subsidiaries, 11affiliated entities, parent companies, or contractual service 12providers, due to placing an excessively high level of debt on 13the same.14    (2) A facility owned, managed, or contained within a fund 15owned or managed by an asset management company, its parent 16companies, or an asset management company which owns or 17manages the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 18parent companies, contractual service providers, or a fund 19containing the same, shall not cause or otherwise take actions 20that would result in the facility, its subsidiaries, 21affiliated entities, parent companies, contractual service 22providers, or the fund containing the same (i) issuing 23debt-funded dividends, (ii) paying management fees or similar 24fees or costs, (iii) issuing dividends at a time or in an 25amount, or perform any other action or exceed any other 26metric, where such actions have a reasonable likelihood of   SB3118- 40 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1causing the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, 2parent companies, or contractual service providers to become 3financially distressed.4    (c) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 5practice within the meaning of the Consumer Fraud and 6Deceptive Business Practices Act. Upon becoming aware of a 7violation, the Department shall notify the Attorney General 8and any labor organization representing workers who work or 9worked for the facility, its subsidiaries, affiliates, parent 10companies, or contractual service providers or in the 11facilities of the same. The Attorney General may take action 12under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act, 13or any other law, to remedy violations of this Section. Labor 14organizations representing workers who work or worked for the 15facility, its subsidiaries, affiliated entities, parent 16companies, or contractual service providers, or in the 17facilities of the same, shall be entitled to the same rights to 18action afforded to individuals under the Consumer Fraud and 19Deceptive Business Practices Act. The Department shall also 20require violators of this Section to prominently display a 21notice detailing the violation in a form, location, and for a 22duration prescribed by the Department.23    (d) The Department shall publish disclosures, written 24notices, and copies of agreements submitted in accordance with 25this Section, upon receipt, and notices of violations issued 26under this Section, upon determination, on its website, for   SB3118- 41 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1public viewing. 2    Section 40. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 3Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2Z as follows: 4    (815 ILCS 505/2Z)  (from Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z)5    Sec. 2Z. Violations of other Acts. Any person who 6knowingly violates the Automotive Repair Act, the Automotive 7Collision Repair Act, the Home Repair and Remodeling Act, the 8Dance Studio Act, the Physical Fitness Services Act, the 9Hearing Instrument Consumer Protection Act, the Illinois Union 10Label Act, the Installment Sales Contract Act, the Job 11Referral and Job Listing Services Consumer Protection Act, the 12Travel Promotion Consumer Protection Act, the Credit Services 13Organizations Act, the Automatic Telephone Dialers Act, the 14Pay-Per-Call Services Consumer Protection Act, the Telephone 15Solicitations Act, the Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act, 16the Cemetery Oversight Act, the Cemetery Care Act, the Safe 17and Hygienic Bed Act, the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 18Act, the High Risk Home Loan Act, the Payday Loan Reform Act, 19the Predatory Loan Prevention Act, the Mortgage Rescue Fraud 20Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Tax 21Act, subsection (a) or (b) of Section 3-10 of the Cigarette Use 22Tax Act, the Electronic Mail Act, the Internet Caller 23Identification Act, paragraph (6) of subsection (k) of Section 246-305 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, Section 11-1431, 18d-115,   SB3118- 42 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b118d-120, 18d-125, 18d-135, 18d-150, or 18d-153 of the Illinois 2Vehicle Code, Article 3 of the Residential Real Property 3Disclosure Act, the Automatic Contract Renewal Act, the 4Reverse Mortgage Act, Section 25 of the Youth Mental Health 5Protection Act, the Personal Information Protection Act, or 6the Student Online Personal Protection Act, Section 4.02i of 7the Illinois Act on the Aging, Section 15.2a or 68a of the 8Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Administrative 9Act, Section 19 of the Community Living Facilities Licensing 10Act, Section 3-103a of the MC/DD Act, Section 3-103a of the 11ID/DD Community Care Act, Section 9a of the 12Community-Integrated Living Arrangements Licensure and 13Certification Act, and Section 7.6a of the Child Care Act of 141969 commits an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 15Act.16(Source: P.A. 100-315, eff. 8-24-17; 100-416, eff. 1-1-18; 17100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-658, eff. 3-23-21.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.  SB3118- 43 -LRB104 17599 KTG 31027 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 105/3.14 new4    20 ILCS 105/4.02i new5    20 ILCS 1705/2from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 100-26    20 ILCS 1705/15.2a new7    20 ILCS 1705/68a new8    210 ILCS 35/3from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 41839    210 ILCS 35/19 new10    210 ILCS 46/3-103a new11    210 ILCS 47/3-103a new12    210 ILCS 135/3from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 170313    210 ILCS 135/9a new14    225 ILCS 10/2.41 new15    225 ILCS 10/7.6a new16    815 ILCS 505/2Zfrom Ch. 121 1/2, par. 262Z